Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [326.441] BAN ON NATURAL GAS AND PROPANE HOOKUPS; PROHIBITION. new text end new text begin A political subdivision is prohibited from adopting an ordinance, resolution, code, policy, or permit requirement that prohibits or has the effect of preventing a utility from (1) connecting or reconnecting natural gas or propane to any building, or (2) supplying natural gas or propane to any building or utility customer. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end